Nebraska, session 109, LB436.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB436 LB436
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-6221, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6221 (1) A health profession shall be regulated by the state only
when:
(a) Unregulated practice is harming or endangering can clearly harm
or endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the public;
(b) Regulation of the health profession does not impose significant
new economic hardship on the public, significantly diminish the supply of
qualified practitioners, or otherwise create barriers to service that are
not consistent with the public welfare and interest;
(b) (c) The public needs assurance from the state of initial and
continuing professional ability; and
(c) The level of regulation that is proposed or in place is adequate
and appropriate in order for the state to protect the health, safety, and
welfare of the public; and
(d) The public cannot be protected by a more effective alternative.
(2) If it is determined that practitioners of a health profession
not currently regulated are prohibited from the full practice of their
profession in Nebraska, then the following criteria shall be used to
determine whether regulation is necessary:
(a) Absence of a separate regulated profession creates a situation
of harm or danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the public;
(b) Creation of a separate regulated profession would not create a
significant new danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the public;
(a) Allowing the profession to practice (c) Creation of a separate
regulated profession would benefit the health, safety, or welfare of the
public; and
(b) There are sufficient requirements for education and training to
ensure initial and continuing professional competency and to protect the
health, safety, and welfare of the public;
(c) The level of regulation would be adequate and appropriate for
-2-

LB436 LB436
2025 2025
the state to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public; and
(d) The public cannot be protected by a more effective alternative.
(3) The scope of practice of a regulated health profession shall be
changed only when:
(a) The health, safety, and welfare of the public are inadequately
addressed by the present scope of practice or limitations on the scope of
practice;
(a) (b) Enactment of the proposed change in scope of practice would
benefit the health, safety, or welfare of the public;
(c) The proposed change in scope of practice does not create a
significant new danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the public;
(b) (d) The current education and training for the health profession
that would be required to perform the new skill or service would be
adequate to ensure professional competency and protect the health,
safety, and welfare of the public; and adequately prepares practitioners
to perform the new skill or service;
(c) The state would have adequate means to assure qualifications and
competency of licensees with regard to the new authority and to take
appropriate action if they are not performing competently.
(e) There are appropriate postprofessional programs and competence
assessment measures available to assure that the practitioner is
competent to perform the new skill or service in a safe manner; and
(f) There are adequate measures to assess whether practitioners are
competently performing the new skill or service and to take appropriate
action if they are not performing competently.
(4) The division shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to , by rule and regulation, establish standards for the application of
each criterion which shall be used by the review bodies in recommending
whether proposals for credentialing or change in scope of practice meet
the criteria.
Sec. 2. Section 71-6223, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-3-

LB436 LB436
2025 2025
amended to read:
71-6223 (1) An applicant group shall submit a letter of intent to
file an application to the director on forms prescribed by the director.
The letter of intent shall identify the applicant group, the proposed
regulation or change in scope of practice sought, and information
sufficient for the director to determine whether the application is
eligible for review.
(2) The director shall notify the applicant group as to whether it
is eligible for review within fifteen days after the receipt of the
letter of intent. The final application shall be submitted to the
director who shall notify the applicant group of its acceptance for
review within fifteen days after receipt of the final application. If
more than one application is received in a given year, the director may
establish the order in which applications shall be reviewed.
(3) The application shall include an explanation of:
(a) The problem created by not regulating a health professional
group not previously regulated or by not changing the scope of practice
of a regulated health profession;
(a) (b) If the application is for the regulation of a health
professional group not previously regulated, all feasible methods of
regulation, including those methods listed in section 71-6222, and the
impact of such methods on the public;
(b) (c) The benefit to the public of regulating a health
professional group not previously regulated or changing the scope of
practice of a regulated health profession;
(c) The extent of any risks or potential adverse consequences for
the health, safety, or welfare of the public which might result from
regulation or from the change of scope of practice;
(d) The extent to which regulation or the change of scope of
practice might harm the public;
(d) (e) The type of standards that exist to ensure that a
-4-

LB436 LB436
2025 2025
practitioner of a health profession would maintain competency;
(e) (f) A description of the health professional group proposed for
regulation, including a list of associations, organizations, and other
groups representing the practitioners in this state, an estimate of the
number of practitioners in each group, and whether the groups represent
different levels of practice;
(f) (g) The role and availability of third-party reimbursement for
the services provided by the applicant group;
(g) (h) The experience of other jurisdictions in regulating the
practitioners affected by the application;
(h) (i) The expected implications costs of regulation, including (i)
the impact registration, certification, or licensure will have on the
costs of the services to the public and (ii) the cost to the state and to
the general public of implementing the proposed legislation; and
(i) (j) Other information relevant to the requested review as
determined by the division.
Sec. 3. Section 71-6224, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6224 (1)(a) (1) The director with the advice of the board shall
appoint an appropriate technical committee to examine and investigate
each application.
(b) For applications involving unregulated health professions or
professions without a regulatory entity under the Uniform Credentialing
Act, the The committee shall consist of six appointed members and one
member of the board designated by the board who shall serve as
chairperson of the committee. The chairperson of the committee shall not
be a member of the applicant group, any health profession sought to be
regulated by the application, or any health profession which is directly
or indirectly affected by the application. The director shall ensure that
the total composition of the committee is fair, impartial, and equitable.
In no event shall more than one member of the same regulated health
-5-

LB436 LB436
2025 2025
profession, the applicant group, or the health profession sought to be
regulated by an application serve on a technical committee.
(c) For applications involving a change of scope of practice for a
regulated health profession with a regulatory entity under the Uniform
Credentialing Act, the regulatory entity of that profession shall serve
as the technical committee.
(2) As soon as possible after its appointment, the committee shall
meet and review the application assigned to it. The committee shall serve
as a factfinding body and undertake such investigation as it deems
necessary to address the issues identified in the application and shall
consult with the applicant group and opponents, if any, in assessing
solutions to those issues that address the health, safety, and welfare of
the public. As part of its investigation, each committee shall consider
available scientific evidence and conduct public factfinding hearings.
Each committee shall comply with the Open Meetings Act.
(3) An applicant group shall have the burden of producing evidence
to support its application.
(4) Each committee shall detail its findings in a report and file
the report with the board and the director. Each committee shall evaluate
the application presented to it on the basis of the appropriate criteria
as established in sections 71-6221 to 71-6223, shall make written
findings on all criteria, and shall make a recommendation for approval or
denial. Whether it recommends approval or denial of an application or
offers a neutral recommendation, the committee may make additional
recommendations regarding changes to the proposal or other solutions to
problems identified during the review and may comment on the anticipated
benefits to the health, safety, and welfare of the public. If the
committee recommends approval of an application for regulation of a
health profession not currently regulated, it shall also recommend the
least restrictive method of regulation to be implemented consistent with
the cost-effective protection of the public and with section 71-6222. The
-6-

LB436 LB436
2025 2025
committee may recommend a specific method of regulation not listed in
section 71-6222 if it finds that such method is the best alternative
method of regulation.
Sec. 4. Section 71-6226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-6226 (1) After receiving and considering reports from the
committee and or the board, the director shall prepare a final report for
the Legislature. The final report shall include copies of the committee
report and the board report, if any, but the director shall not be bound
by the findings and recommendations of such reports. The director in
compiling his or her report shall apply the criteria established in
sections 71-6221 to 71-6223 and may consult with the board or the
committee. The recommendation of the director shall be developed in a
manner consistent with subsection (4) of section 71-6224. The director
shall electronically submit his or her report, along with the reports of
the committee and the board, final report shall be submitted
electronically to the Speaker of the Legislature, the Chairperson of the
Executive Board of the Legislature, and the Chairperson of the Health and
Human Services Committee of the Legislature no later than six twelve
months after the application is submitted to the director and found to be
complete and shall be made available electronically to all other members
of the Legislature upon request.
(2) The director may recommend that no legislative action be taken
on an application. If the director recommends that an application of an
applicant group be approved, the director shall recommend an agency to be
responsible for the regulation and the level of regulation to be assigned
to such applicant group.
(3) An application which is resubmitted shall be considered the same
as a new application.
Sec. 5. Original sections 71-6221, 71-6223, 71-6224, and 71-6226,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-7-